District of Columbia statutes.
7-875.01

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is:

(1)

To establish age-appropriate health screening requirements for all children, from birth to 21 years of age, in the District of Columbia, regardless of their insurance status, who:

(A)

Reside in the District;

(B)

Are wards of the District; or

(C)

Are children with special needs who reside or are receiving services in another state;

(2)

To improve the overall health status of all children by ensuring consistency in health screening and early detection of health problems and enabling children to obtain the necessary prevention, treatment, and intervention services at the earliest opportunity;

(3)

To reduce parental stress and increase parental satisfaction and compliance with all child-related health, human or social services, and educational programs by using a uniform health assessment form; and

(4)

To provide the Mayor with the information necessary to effectively plan, establish, and evaluate a comprehensive system of appropriate preventive services for children for early detection of potential health problems.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 302, 52 DCR 2331
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 301 and 302 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 301 and 302 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 301 and 302 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 301 and 302 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 301 and 302 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 301 and 302 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 301 and 302 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 301, 302 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 301, 302 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 301, 302 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 301, 302 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).